Nebraska, session 109, LB702.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 10 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The purpose of the Neighborhood Empowerment Act is to
allocate financial resources directly to neighborhood associations across
Nebraska.
(2) The intent of the Neighborhood Empowerment Act is to support
locally driven initiatives that:
(a) Enhance community engagement, infrastructure, safety, economic
development, and overall quality of life;
(b) Require minimal administrative restrictions; and
(c) Allow communities to address their unique needs.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Neighborhood Empowerment Act:
(1) Advisory board means the Neighborhood Empowerment Advisory
Board;
(2) Alliance means a collaborative organization made up of
representatives from multiple neighborhood associations within a specific
geographic area, city, or community and serves as a unifying body that
connects neighborhood groups together to work collectively on shared
concerns, priorities, and initiatives;
(3) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(4) Eligible project means an initiative undertaken by a
neighborhood association that serves its local community, including any
infrastructure improvement, public safety enhancement, economic
development activity, community event, environmental project, or other
local community-building activity;
(5) Grant-spending deadline means the date one calendar year after
the date when grant money was received under the Neighborhood Empowerment
Act;
(6) Local means specific to or directly connected with a particular
place, community, or region; and
(7) Neighborhood association means any organization consisting of
-2-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
residents or stakeholders from a defined geographic area, formally
recognized by a local government or governed by bylaws, with the purpose
of enhancing community engagement, safety, and quality of life.
Sec. 4. (1) Any neighborhood association in this state may apply to
the department for a grant under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
(2) To be eligible to receive a grant under the Neighborhood
Empowerment Act, the applicant shall:
(a) Complete the application form prescribed by the department;
(b) Demonstrate how initiatives of the applicant promote
neighborhood association membership or resident participation;
(c) Provide proof of an active membership base;
(d) Provide records of at least six months of regular meetings; and
(e) Provide a plan to recruit and engage residents within the
neighborhood.
(3) The application prescribed by the department pursuant to this
section shall only require the following information:
(a) The name of the neighborhood association;
(b) Contact information for the neighborhood association;
(c) A statement of the intended use for any grant money that is
received under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
(4)(a) The department may award up to five million dollars in grants
each fiscal year under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act, subject to
available appropriations.
(b) When awarding grants the department shall prioritize any
applicant that:
(i) Provides technical assistance and resources to neighborhood
associations;
(ii) Facilitates leadership development and capacity-building
programs; and
(iii) Ensures equitable distribution of resources to historically
underserved communities.
-3-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
(c) Grants awarded under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act shall be
allocated evenly between each congressional district.
Sec. 5. (1) Grant money received by a neighborhood association
shall be used on or prior to the grant-spending deadline.
(2) Such grant money shall be used for opportunities for resident
participation, including community meetings, volunteer activities, and
public feedback sessions.
(3) Such grant money may be used for any of the following:
(a) Community programming, including any event, workshop, or clean-
up;
(b) Infrastructure improvement, including any park upgrade,
community garden, or neighborhood signage;
(c) Safety or health initiative, including any lighting, traffic-
calming measure, or public health outreach;
(d) Economic and job development initiative, including any support
for local business or any job training program; or
(e) Building the organizational capacity of neighborhood
associations, including leadership training, governance workshops, and
technology upgrades.
(4) Grant money received by a neighborhood association shall not be
used for any:
(a) Salary;
(b) Political campaign activity;
(c) Activity that does not serve the public good; or
(d) Activity that falls outside the scope of neighborhood
improvement.
Sec. 6. (1) Each neighborhood association that received a grant
under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act shall submit:
(a) A report to the department no later than the grant-spending
deadline for such grant; and
(b) An updated report during the thirty days prior to the
-4-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
anniversary of such date in each of the next two years.
(2) Each such report shall include the following information:
(a) The amount of grant money received under the Neighborhood
Empowerment Act and the amount of such money that has been spent;
(b) How the grant money received under the Neighborhood Empowerment
Act has been spent;
(c) Any general impact or benefit that has been observed due to a
grant received under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act;
(d) Any suggestions for improvement of the Neighborhood Empowerment
Act; and
(e) Changes in membership and participation levels.
(3) The reports required under subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted through the department's website in a manner prescribed by
the department.
(4) The department may work with a qualified intermediary
organization to assist in the oversight, reporting, and evaluation of
neighborhood association grant usage. Any such organization shall provide
regular progress updates to the department and ensure compliance with the
intent of the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
Sec. 7. (1) The department shall recoup any grant money that:
(a) Remains unused after the grant-spending deadline of the grant;
or
(b) Was used in a manner inconsistent with section 5 of this act.
(2) Any money recouped by the department under this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
Sec. 8. (1) The Neighborhood Empowerment Advisory Board is
established.
(2) The advisory board shall consist of nine members appointed by
the Governor who are representatives from neighborhood associations in
Nebraska.
(3) Each member shall serve for two years, and no member shall serve
-5-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
consecutive terms.
(4) The Governor shall appoint a replacement member for any vacancy
on the advisory board, and such replacement member shall serve the
remainder of such term.
(5) There shall not be more than three members from each
congressional district on the advisory board at any time.
(6) At least one individual from each congressional district shall
represent a neighborhood association that is in a qualified census tract
as defined in section 19-5803.
(7) The advisory board shall provide feedback to the department
regarding the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
Sec. 9. (1) The department shall:
(a) Conduct specific outreach efforts to encourage residents to form
or join a neighborhood association, including toolkits and workshops on
the benefits of neighborhood associations; and
(b) Designate a qualified local intermediary organization to
administer funding for neighborhood associations within a city of the
metropolitan class. Such organization shall:
(i) Have a proven track record of successfully supporting
neighborhood development and engagement initiatives;
(ii) Demonstrate expertise in capacity building, community
organizing, and leadership development within neighborhoods;
(iii) Be recognized for fostering collaboration between
neighborhoods, local government, and community organizations; and
(iv) Maintain operational transparency and accountability in the
disbursement of money.
(2) The department may work with a local intermediary organization
to conduct informational workshops, develop toolkits, and provide ongoing
training for neighborhood associations to maximize the impact of grant
funding.
Sec. 10. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five
-6-

LB702 LB702
2025 2025
million dollars from the General Fund each fiscal year to the department
for grants under the Neighborhood Empowerment Act.
-7-